Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3414
Agreement; driver; qualifications; records.

(1) A program shall not enter into an agreement with any driver unless such driver:

(a) Holds an operator's license issued in Nebraska authorizing the driver to operate vehicles of the class of vehicle used by the program; or

(b) Is a nonresident who:

(i) Holds a driver's license or an operator's license issued by the state or country of the driver's residence that authorizes the driver in that state or country to drive vehicles of the class of vehicle used by the program; and

(ii) Is at least the same age as that required of a resident to drive in Nebraska.

(2) A program shall keep a record of:

(a) The name and address of each driver; and

(b) The driver's license number and place of issuance of such license for each driver who operates a vehicle under an agreement.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 14.